North Carolina, session 2025, SB562.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) This act shall be known and may be cited as the North Carolina
Cybersecurity and Quantum Resilience Study Act.
SECTION 1.(b) The North Carolina Cybersecurity and Quantum Resilience Study
Commission (Commission) is established to investigate the potential impacts of emerging
quantum computing technologies on the security of State systems, legacy encryption methods,
and critical infrastructure—including the Internet of Things (IoT) and smart city initiatives. The
Commission shall review vulnerabilities and provide recommendations on necessary future
measures to enhance the state's cybersecurity posture. To help guide the Commission work, the
General Assembly finds that:
(1) Advances in quantum computing pose potential risks to traditional encryption
methods, such as Rivest–Shamir–Adleman (RSA) and Elliptic Curve
Cryptography (CC), that many State and local systems rely on.
(2) Emerging technologies and IoT integrations, common in smart city initiatives,
could be at risk if quantum computing breakthroughs compromise existing
security protocols.
(3) North Carolina is home to a robust academic and technological ecosystem
which can contribute significantly to understanding and mitigating these risks.
(4) A proactive study is necessary to understand the scope of these vulnerabilities
and to inform potential legislative or administrative actions in the future.
SECTION 1.(c) The Commission shall be composed of twenty-one (21) members,
with seven members appointed by the Governor, seven members appointed by the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate, and seven members appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, as follows:
(1) Five representatives from cabinet agencies appointed by the Governor.
(2) Three cybersecurity experts from both the public and private sectors appointed
by the President Pro Tempore.
(3) Two academic experts in quantum computing and cybersecurity from North
Carolina institutions appointed by the President Pro Tempore
(4) Three industry representatives involved in IoT, smart infrastructure, and
cryptographic technologies appointed by the Speaker.
*S562-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) Two public policy experts with experience in technology and cybersecurity
appointed by the Speaker.
(6) Six members of the general public knowledgeable about State government or
information technology.
SECTION 1.(d) The Commission is charged with the following duties:
(1) Conducting a comprehensive review of state IT systems and critical
infrastructure to identify vulnerabilities associated with legacy encryption
methods.
(2) Evaluating the potential impact of quantum computing on these systems.
(3) Analyzing current and emerging quantum-resistant cryptographic standards.
(4) Assessing risks in IoT and smart city implementations.
(5) Providing a roadmap and recommendations for necessary legislative,
regulatory, or administrative measures to bolster cybersecurity against future
quantum threats.
SECTION 1.(e) The Commission's tasks and deliverables include:
(1) Risk assessment to identify and document systems and sectors most
vulnerable to quantum-related cyber threats and evaluate the state's current
cybersecurity measures and determine gaps in protection.
(2) Research collaboration to engage with local universities and industry experts
to gather insights on quantum-resistant cryptographic techniques.
(3) Develop a recommendation roadmap to propose a timeline for transitioning to
quantum-safe encryption methods where needed and outline potential policies
or incentives for upgrading critical infrastructure security.
SECTION 1.(f) The Commission shall submit a comprehensive report with findings,
a detailed risk assessment, and recommended actions to the General Assembly by July 1, 2026.
SECTION 2.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund
to the General Assembly the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) to fund the
work of the Commission, including research initiatives, public hearings, stakeholder meetings,
and report development. The Commission may explore potential partnerships or federal grant
opportunities to supplement research and study efforts.
SECTION 2.(b) The Commission shall be convened within 30 days of this act's
enactment. The Commission members shall elect a chair and vice-chair. Members of the
Commission shall receive reimbursement as provided by Chapter 138 of the General Statutes.
SECTION 2.(c) Sensitive information received by the Commission shall remain
confidential and does not constitute a public record as defined by G.S. 132-1. For the purposes
of this subsection, the chair and vice-chair of the Commission may designate jointly information
as sensitive after balancing the need for public access against security concerns and
confidentiality requirements.
SECTION 2.(d) The Joint Legislative Committee on Information Technology shall
monitor the commission's progress. The Commission's report and recommendations will be
reviewed by the General Assembly to determine any further legislative or administrative actions
necessary during the 2026 Regular Session of the 2025 General Assembly, with provisions for
subsequent studies or actions as needed.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 562-First Edition